Utah statutes.
30-3-37.   Relocation.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "relocation" means moving 150 miles or more
from the residence specified in the court's decree.
(2)  The relocating parent shall provide, if possible, 60 days advance written
notice of the intended relocation to the other parent.  The written notice of
relocation shall contain statements affirming the following:
(a)  the parent-time provisions in Subsection (5) or a schedule approved by
both parties will be followed; and
(b)  neither parent will interfere with the other's parental rights pursuant
to court ordered parent-time arrangements, or the schedule approved by both
parties.
(3)  The court may, upon motion of any party or upon the court's own motion,
schedule a hearing with notice to review the notice of relocation and parent-
time schedule as provided in Section 30-3-35 and make appropriate orders
regarding the parent-time and costs for parent-time transportation.
(4)  In determining the parent-time schedule and allocating the transportation
costs, the court shall consider:
(a)  the reason for the parent's relocation;
(b)  the additional costs or difficulty to both parents in exercising parent-
time;
(c)  the economic resources of both parents; and
(d)  other factors the court considers necessary and relevant.
(5)  Unless otherwise ordered by the court, upon the relocation, as defined in
Subsection (1), of one of the parties the following schedule shall be the
minimum requirements for parent-time with a school-age child:
(a)  in years ending in an odd number, the child shall spend the following
holidays with the noncustodial parent:
(i)  Thanksgiving holiday beginning Wednesday until Sunday; and
(ii)  Spring break, if applicable, beginning the last day of school before the
holiday until the day before school resumes;
(b)  in years ending in an even number, the child shall spend the following
holidays with the noncustodial parent:
(i)  the entire winter school break period; and
(ii)  the Fall school break beginning the last day of school before the
holiday until the day before school resumes;
(c)  extended parent-time equal to 1/2 of the summer or off-track time for
consecutive weeks.  The children should be returned to the custodial home no
later than seven days before school begins; however, this week shall be
counted when determining the amount of parent-time to be divided between the
parents for the summer or off-track period; and
(d) one weekend per month, at the option and expense of the noncustodial
parent.
(6)  The noncustodial parent's monthly weekend entitlement is subject to the
following restrictions.
(a)  If the noncustodial parent has not designated a specific weekend for
parent-time, the noncustodial parent shall receive the last weekend of each
month unless a holiday assigned to the custodial parent falls on that
particular weekend.  If a holiday assigned to the custodial parent falls on
the last weekend of the month, the noncustodial parent shall be entitled to
the next to the last weekend of the month.
(b)  If a noncustodial parent's extended parent-time or parent-time over a
holiday extends into or through the first weekend of the next month, that
weekend shall be considered the noncustodial parent's monthly weekend
entitlement for that month.
(c)  If a child is out of school for teacher development days or snow days
after the children begin the school year, or other days not included in the
list of holidays in Subsection (5) and those days are contiguous with the
noncustodial parent's monthly weekend parent-time, those days shall be
included in the weekend parent-time.
(7)  The custodial parent is entitled to all parent-time not specifically
allocated to the noncustodial parent.
(8)  In the event finances and distance preclude the exercise of minimum
parent-time for the noncustodial parent during the school year, the court
should consider awarding more time for the noncustodial parent during the
summer time if it is in the best interests of the children.
(9)  Upon the motion of any party, the court may order uninterrupted parent-
time with the noncustodial parent for a minimum of 30 days during extended
parent-time, unless the court finds it is not in the best interests of the
child.  If the court orders uninterrupted parent-time during a period not
covered by this section, it shall specify in its order which parent is
responsible for the child's travel expenses.
(10)  Unless otherwise ordered by the court the relocating party shall be
responsible for all the child's travel expenses relating to Subsections (5)(a)
and (b) and 1/2 of the child's travel expenses relating to Subsection (5)(c),
provided the noncustodial parent is current on all support obligations.  If
the noncustodial parent has been found in contempt for not being current on
all support obligations, the noncustodial parent shall be responsible for all
of the child's travel expenses under Subsection (5), unless the court rules
otherwise.  Reimbursement by either responsible party to the other for the
child's travel expenses shall be made within 30 days of receipt of documents
detailing those expenses.
(11)  The court may apply this provision to any preexisting decree of divorce.
(12)  Any action under this section may be set for an expedited hearing.
(13)  A parent who fails to comply with the notice of relocation in Subsection
(2) shall be in contempt of the court's order.
